Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4922.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1531k. The department, the board of a school district or intermediate school district, or the board of directors of a public school academy shall not require an individual to obtain an endorsement or certificate beyond a teaching certificate described in section 1531 for that individual to serve as a school librarian in a public school in this state.